District of Columbia statutes.
15-315

Death, removal, or disqualification of marshal.

When the marshal dies, or is removed from office, or becomes otherwise disqualified from executing a writ of execution received by him, the writ may be executed and returned by his deputy or successor in office.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 15-315.
1973 Ed., § 15-315.

Prior Codifications